Hawaii statutes.
[§23-67] Expenses. The members of the
committee and ad hoc committees shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for all necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties. [L 1989, c 165, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next